Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Forfeiture of Property for Violation of Fish and Game Laws

§ 49-7-251.
Petition for forfeiture; service of process; procedure to determine ownership of particular types of property; hearing prerequisite.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 49-7-257, when any property is seized pursuant to Section 49-7-103, 49-15-21(2) or 59-21-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, proceedings under this section shall be instituted promptly. Provided, however, that the seizing law enforcement agency may, in the sound exercise of discretion, decide not to bring a forfeiture action if the interests of bona fide lienholders or secured creditors equal or exceed the value of the seized property, or if other factors would produce a negative economic result. Provided further, that no property shall be subject to forfeiture which has been stolen from its owner if the owner can be identified and prosecution for the theft has been initiated.

A petition for forfeiture shall be filed promptly in the name of the State of Mississippi, the county or the municipality and may be filed in the county in which the seizure is made, the county in which the criminal prosecution is brought or the county in which the owner of the seized property is found. Forfeiture proceedings may be brought in the circuit court or the county court if a county court exists in the county and the value of the seized property is within the jurisdictional limits of the county court as set forth in Section 9-9-21, Mississippi Code of 1972. A copy of such petition shall be served upon the following persons by service of process in the same manner as in civil cases:

The owner of the property, if address is known;

Any secured party who has registered his lien or filed a financing statement as provided by law, if the identity of such secured party can be ascertained by the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency by making a good faith effort to ascertain the identity of such secured party as described in subsections (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) of this section;

Any other bona fide lienholder or secured party or other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest of whom the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency has actual knowledge; and

Any person in possession of property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized.

If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that the vehicle has been titled, the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency shall make inquiry of the State Tax Commission as to what the records of the State Tax Commission show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle and who, if anyone, holds any lien or security interest which affects the vehicle.

If the property is a motor vehicle and is not titled in the State of Mississippi, then the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency shall attempt to ascertain the name and address of the person in whose name the vehicle is licensed, and if the vehicle is licensed in a state which has in effect a certificate of title law, the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency shall make inquiry of the appropriate agency of that state as to what the records of the agency show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle and who, if anyone, holds any lien, security interest or other instrument in the nature of a security device which affects the vehicle.

If the property is of a nature that a financing statement is required by the laws of this state to be filed to perfect a security interest affecting the property and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that a financing statement covering the security interest has been filed under the laws of this state, the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency shall make inquiry of the appropriate office designated in Section 75-9-501, Mississippi Code of 1972, as to what the records show as to who is the record owner of the property and who, if anyone, has filed a financing statement affecting the property.

If the property is an aircraft or part thereof and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a security device affects the property, then the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency shall make inquiry of the Administrator of the Mississippi Aeronautics Commission as to what the records of the Federal Aviation Administration show as to who is the record owner of the property and who, if anyone, holds an instrument in the nature of a security device which affects the property.

In the case of all other personal property subject to forfeiture, if there is any reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a security device affects the property, then the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency shall make a good faith inquiry to identify the holder of any such instrument.

In the event the answer to an inquiry states that the record owner of the property is any person other than the person who was in possession of it when it was seized, or states that any person holds any lien, encumbrance, security interest, other interest in the nature of a security interest, mortgage or deed of trust which affects the property, the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency shall cause any record owner and also any lienholder, secured party, other person who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest which affects the property to be named in the petition of forfeiture and to be served with process in the same manner as in civil cases.

If the owner of the property cannot be found and served with a copy of the petition of forfeiture, or if no person was in possession of the property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized and the owner of the property is unknown, the Department of Wildlife Conservation or the local law enforcement agency shall file with the clerk of the court in which the proceeding is pending an affidavit to such effect, whereupon the clerk of the court shall publish notice of the hearing addressed to “the Unknown Owner of_______________ ,” filling in the blank space with a reasonably detailed description of the property subject to forfeiture. Service by publication shall contain the other requisites prescribed in Section 11-33-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be served as provided in Section 11-33-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, for publication of notice for attachments at law.

No proceedings instituted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall proceed to hearing unless the judge conducting the hearing is satisfied that this section has been complied with. Any answer received from an inquiry required by subsections (3) through (7) of this section shall be introduced into evidence at the hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 77; Laws, 2001, ch. 495, § 25, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2002.

§ 49-7-253.
Time to file answer; failure to file; time for hearing; burden of proof; evidence at hearing; decision.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 49-7-257, an owner of property that has been seized pursuant to Section 49-7-103, 49-15-21(2) or 59-21-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall file an answer within thirty (30) days after the completion of service of process. If an answer is not filed, the court shall hear evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture and forfeit the property to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or the local law enforcement agency. If an answer is filed, a time for hearing on forfeiture shall be set within thirty (30) days of filing the answer or at the succeeding term of court, if court would not be in progress within thirty (30) days after filing the answer. Provided, however, that upon request by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the local law enforcement agency or the owner of the property, the court may postpone said forfeiture hearing to a date past the time any criminal action is pending against said owner.

If the owner of the property has filed an answer denying that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the burden is on the petitioner to prove that the property is subject to forfeiture. However, if an answer has not been filed by the owner of the property, the petition for forfeiture may be introduced into evidence and is prima facie evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture. The standard of proof placed upon the petitioner in regard to property forfeited under the provisions of this article shall be by a preponderance of the evidence.

At the hearing any claimant of any right, title or interest in the property may prove his lien, encumbrance, security interest or other interest in the nature of a security interest to be bona fide and created without knowledge or consent that the property was to be used so as to cause the property to be subject to forfeiture.

If it is found that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the judge shall forfeit the property to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or the local law enforcement agency. However, if proof at the hearing discloses that the interest of any bona fide lienholder, secured party, other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest is greater than or equal to the present value of the property, the court shall order the property released to him. If such interest is less than the present value of the property and if the proof shows that the property is subject to forfeiture, the court shall order the property forfeited to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or the local law enforcement agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 522, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 78, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-255.
Liquidation of forfeited property; disposition of proceeds; retention and use of certain property; issuance of certificate of title.

All other property which is forfeited under Sections 49-7-251 through 49-7-257, and except as provided in subsections (2), (5) and (6) of this section, shall be liquidated and, after deduction of court costs and the expenses of liquidation, the proceeds shall be divided and deposited as follows:

In the event only one (1) law enforcement agency participates in the underlying criminal case out of which the forfeiture arises, fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer and deposited in the General Fund of the state and fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be deposited and credited to the budget of the participating law enforcement agency.

In the event more than one (1) law enforcement agency participates in the underlying criminal case out of which the forfeiture arises, fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be deposited and credited to the budget of the law enforcement agency whose officers initiated the criminal case and fifty percent (50%) shall be divided equitably between or among the other participating law enforcement agencies, and shall be deposited and credited to the budgets of the participating law enforcement agencies. In the event that the other participating law enforcement agencies cannot agree on the division of their fifty percent (50%), a petition shall be filed by any one (1) of them in the court in which the civil forfeiture case is brought and the court shall make an equitable division.

All money which is forfeited under Sections 49-7-251 through 49-7-257 shall be divided, deposited and credited in the same manner as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

All property forfeited, deposited and credited to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks under Sections 49-7-251 through 49-7-257 shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer and deposited in a special fund for use by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks upon appropriation by the Legislature.

All other property that has been forfeited shall, except as otherwise provided, be sold at a public auction for cash by the chief law enforcement officer of the initiating law enforcement agency, or his designee, to the highest and best bidder after advertising the sale for at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last notice to appear not more than ten (10) days nor less than five (5) days prior to such sale, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the jurisdiction in which said law enforcement agency is located. Such notices shall contain a description of the property to be sold and a statement of the time and place of sale. It shall not be necessary to the validity of such sale either to have the property present at the place of sale or to have the name of the owner thereof stated in such notice. The proceeds of the sale shall be disposed of as follows:

To any bona fide lienholder, secured party, or other party holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, to the extent of his interest; and

The balance, if any, remaining after deduction of all storage, court costs and expenses of liquidation shall be divided, forwarded and deposited in the same manner set out in subsection (1) of this section.

Any state, county or municipal law enforcement agency may maintain, repair, use and operate for official purposes all property or money that has been forfeited to the agency if it is free from any interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest. Such state, county or municipal law enforcement agency may purchase the interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest so that the property can be released for its use. If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law, the law enforcement agency shall be deemed to be the purchaser, and the certificate of title shall be issued to it as required by subsection (7) of this section.

The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may maintain, repair, use and operate for official purposes all property, other than money that has been forfeited to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks if it is free from any interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party, or other party who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest. In such case, the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may purchase the interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party, or other party who holds an interest so that such property can be released for use by the department.

The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may maintain, repair, use and operate such property with money appropriated to the department for current operations. If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law, the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks is deemed to be the purchaser and the certificate of title shall be issued to it as required by subsection (7) of this section.

The State Tax Commission shall issue a certificate of title to any person who purchases property under the provisions of this section when a certificate of title is required under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 468, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 79, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-257.
Administrative forfeiture procedures for certain property.

When any property the value of which does not exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), is seized pursuant to Section 49-7-103, 49-15-21(2) or 59-21-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, the property may be forfeited by the administrative forfeiture procedures provided for in this section.

The attorney for the seizing law enforcement agency shall provide notice of intention to forfeit the seized property administratively, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to all persons who are required to be notified pursuant to Section 49-7-251(2).

In the event that notice of intention to forfeit the seized property administratively cannot be given as provided in subsection (2) of this section because of refusal, failure to claim, insufficient address or any other reason, the attorney for the seizing law enforcement agency shall provide notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the seizure occurred for once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks.

Notice pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall include the following information:

A description of the property;

The approximate value of the property;

The date and place of the seizure;

The connection between the property and the violation of the Game and Fish Law, as set forth in Section 49-7-103, Mississippi Code of 1972;

The instructions for filing a request for judicial review; and

A statement that the property will be forfeited to the seizing law enforcement agency if a request for judicial review is not timely filed.

Persons claiming an interest in the seized property may initiate judicial review of the seizure and proposed forfeiture by filing a request for judicial review with the attorney for the seizing law enforcement agency, within thirty (30) days after receipt of the certified letter or within thirty (30) days after the first publication of notice, whichever is applicable.

If no request for judicial review is timely filed, the attorney for the seizing law enforcement agency shall prepare a written declaration of forfeiture of the subject property and the forfeited property shall be used, distributed or disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Section 49-7-255.

Upon receipt of a timely request for judicial review, the attorney for the seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly file a petition for forfeiture and proceed as provided in Section 49-7-251.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 468, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 522, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1991.